epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lv.xml
	<patterns>
		d4z
		d4ž
		a2i
		a2u
		i2e
		e2i
		u2i
		i2u
		o2i
		o2u
		e2u
		.vi1s2a.
		.vi1s2ā.
		.vi1s2i.
		.vi1s2os.
		.vi1s2u.
		.vi1s2iem.
		o1pī
		ū1rē
		i1ta
		ū1ga
		ē1žu
		ū1to
		ā1ni
		i1rē
		i1čo
		ā1bu
		o1mī
		o1kā
		o1či
		ā1lo
		e1čū
		o1ļā
		e1la
		i1šo
		o1bi
		ē1cē
		ā1ru
		o1si
		u1no
		e1hā
		ā1nē
		e1bū
		i1ru
		o1sū
		a1ča
		ā1ča
		o1rē
		i1ke
		o1ra
		u1te
		i1zo
		i1gi
		ē1ma
		ū1ķe
		ū1ca
		o1dē
		a1nā
		ā1ge
		e1či
		ū1bē
		ē1tā
		ā1fi
		i1zi
		o1lī
		e1še
		e1gā
		i1fo
		a1ņo
		u1to
		ī1zē
		ū1gu
		ā1ša
		i1ķi
		ū1nē
		ī1ma
		ā1te
		ē1kē
		ū1mā
		u1zu
		o1sā
		ē1bu
		ī1ga
		e1di
		ī1te
		a1ļī
		e1tē
		i1že
		o1fo
		ā1pu
		o1hu
		ē1do
		o1du
		ā1ma
		ū1mi
		e1re
		i1ha
		i1be
		e1lu
		ā1ja
		ū1ta
		a1šū
		a1da
		ē1cī
		i1bu
		a1pī
		u1ņā
		e1zu
		ū1no
		e1nī
		i1no
		e1mā
		ē1ļa
		ū1pā
		ā1be
		ā1mo
		ī1ja
		e1ji
		ī1re
		e1ce
		ī1ri
		ī1tī
		ū1ni
		ī1žī
		i1ži
		a1fī
		a1be
		e1šā
		e1ķo
		e1pū
		e1ļī
		u1ģi
		ē1tī
		a1ci
		e1jē
		a1zī
		o1lē
		u1ga
		ī1ci
		a1ke
		e1ho
		i1nū
		ū1šī
		e1si
		e1bo
		o1ģē
		u1ņi
		u1sē
		ē1bā
		o1ša
		ū1ro
		ē1ce
		i1zī
		i1ve
		o1ļu
		i1dī
		o1ku
		e1vē
		a1ri
		u1sā
		i1pā
		i1dē
		o1pū
		ī1vī
		a1me
		ē1ze
		ī1bē
		u1ķe
		a1bē
		a1ja
		ā1ļo
		a1jē
		e1fe
		o1pu
		o1to
		ē1vē
		a1ki
		o1mā
		o1lo
		a1lo
		ē1ķi
		e1šē
		ū1dī
		ū1cā
		o1zo
		o1gū
		o1gā
		ī1tē
		e1zē
		ī1le
		e1gī
		ī1na
		o1me
		e1po
		e1fu
		a1ģe
		u1rū
		u1ri
		ū1jo
		e1dē
		a1ļa
		a1žā
		ī1ļa
		ē1ne
		a1zū
		ā1vē
		e1so
		o1mi
		o1šo
		ē1sī
		ē1ļu
		e1ga
		i1pē
		e1vu
		o1ru
		ē1ju
		u1či
		ā1va
		a1hu
		ī1sē
		e1ķa
		i1rā
		a1čā
		ī1ki
		i1ti
		u1cu
		i1žu
		ā1jo
		u1ki
		u1mu
		o1ķī
		e1ma
		ī1ļo
		ē1de
		o1čo
		ā1ču
		i1ņa
		u1ļa
		u1mā
		o1he
		i1lī
		a1de
		o1fa
		ē1ro
		o1sī
		ā1ri
		ū1ti
		o1bē
		a1jā
		ū1zu
		ā1vī
		e1ļe
		o1ņa
		ī1de
		ī1še
		a1kū
		ū1ja
		o1dī
		e1ži
		e1ri
		ī1gā
		e1ki
		u1ze
		u1ma
		i1vī
		ē1pī
		u1lu
		e1ti
		o1čā
		a1ķi
		ū1zē
		a1ļo
		i1či
		o1ke
		a1ģu
		i1vē
		u1ču
		u1ca
		u1vu
		o1ļa
		i1ri
		o1ņo
		u1co
		a1rā
		o1jā
		ī1bi
		e1čī
		ē1rē
		e1kā
		i1pi
		a1ka
		ā1vu
		ū1ža
		e1mī
		e1vī
		o1gi
		a1pē
		ū1zā
		i1cē
		e1va
		o1nī
		ī1ru
		e1pā
		a1ce
		ē1kā
		o1ja
		a1hē
		a1bo
		ū1mu
		ī1ve
		i1nā
		i1fi
		o1va
		u1žu
		e1ģi
		ē1nī
		i1li
		i1ņo
		u1la
		ī1ģe
		e1ca
		a1tā
		ū1zi
		a1bū
		ē1pē
		ī1su
		ī1pā
		ī1zu
		ū1di
		e1lo
		ā1mā
		e1ci
		a1ža
		ē1to
		e1rū
		ā1la
		u1ķu
		o1ģī
		ā1pa
		e1lū
		e1sī
		e1bē
		i1co
		i1ķē
		a1šo
		ū1ku
		u1šā
		o1di
		a1ņa
		ī1pa
		o1pi
		a1žē
		a1si
		a1ha
		u1šo
		ē1mā
		ī1mo
		ā1žo
		ū1lu
		e1žū
		o1ķi
		ā1vā
		a1žo
		i1zā
		a1ku
		o1zi
		o1dā
		e1cu
		ī1no
		e1zi
		e1jū
		ā1ņo
		i1ce
		ū1lē
		a1žī
		o1mē
		i1bī
		o1re
		e1zū
		ū1ra
		a1gi
		i1lē
		ī1bā
		ū1šu
		e1bi
		i1gū
		ū1ķi
		ē1va
		ā1to
		u1ce
		a1pū
		ā1gi
		i1ķe
		ā1kā
		e1ķī
		ē1ža
		u1ve
		u1vo
		ē1no
		o1bu
		a1tī
		e1fi
		e1ļo
		ū1ži
		a1tū
		ī1ti
		ī1la
		i1ho
		ē1gi
		i1fū
		a1tē
		ā1ķi
		a1mi
		e1ra
		u1ja
		e1me
		ī1bu
		i1pu
		o1la
		a1ķī
		u1šu
		o1ža
		a1rū
		ū1ļa
		e1ču
		ī1lo
		o1nu
		ā1jē
		a1dā
		u1rē
		u1rī
		ē1žo
		i1mā
		a1zo
		o1žu
		ē1da
		ī1co
		ū1zī
		ā1sa
		ē1šu
		ū1po
		i1si
		u1zē
		ū1ri
		u1zī
		ū1gā
		e1pu
		ā1du
		e1cē
		ē1ji
		i1bi
		ē1rā
		i1ļi
		u1nu
		i1ki
		a1mū
		ī1ni
		ā1fe
		ē1ca
		ā1ņi
		u1go
		a1nu
		e1nē
		u1ku
		ā1ži
		ē1go
		e1če
		ē1za
		ā1čā
		i1ģe
		ī1go
		a1go
		e1bī
		i1ze
		e1šū
		o1kē
		o1pē
		i1na
		ā1ra
		ā1jī
		o1za
		e1zā
		a1lā
		e1ņē
		a1je
		ē1si
		ā1bo
		u1gā
		i1sē
		u1ši
		u1bī
		a1vā
		e1ko
		ā1šu
		ā1ģē
		i1mo
		e1ļā
		i1tē
		u1ļā
		a1ņē
		u1na
		ī1vo
		ū1me
		a1hī
		ū1ka
		ā1mī
		ā1lī
		ū1tu
		e1je
		ī1vā
		a1ba
		ī1dā
		ū1ko
		ū1cē
		ā1nī
		a1ļē
		u1ju
		ā1žā
		ū1mo
		i1ge
		ā1pā
		e1lā
		i1ķī
		a1sē
		e1ni
		a1ma
		a1tu
		i1kū
		a1bi
		i1jī
		ī1ķu
		e1fā
		u1ta
		ē1dē
		a1gā
		i1lā
		i1ņi
		e1ļa
		ē1ti
		ā1bi
		a1ši
		a1lī
		i1ja
		e1mu
		o1hē
		u1jā
		ū1ša
		i1sā
		u1po
		ā1cā
		a1se
		o1ņe
		u1fo
		ā1sū
		ā1bū
		o1co
		o1ķē
		ā1ļa
		e1že
		u1tī
		ī1ku
		u1ķa
		u1zi
		e1do
		i1so
		o1fi
		ē1sā
		i1pī
		ī1ši
		a1dī
		ā1ti
		u1ņo
		u1pa
		o1ka
		o1cī
		i1pe
		ī1mā
		ā1pē
		ā1pī
		ū1pē
		o1bū
		e1ķē
		a1mē
		ā1rū
		o1de
		i1ķa
		o1šī
		ī1gu
		u1bi
		ā1ka
		ā1nu
		u1ži
		u1so
		ē1ka
		ā1le
		ē1pe
		u1ļī
		ī1me
		u1dī
		i1žā
		i1du
		ē1ra
		o1vo
		o1fā
		o1so
		ā1ļā
		e1dā
		ā1gu
		o1bo
		e1hī
		ā1ģi
		ā1čo
		a1dē
		u1di
		ī1se
		ē1sē
		ā1nā
		a1nī
		ū1rā
		o1hi
		o1šā
		i1lū
		ē1lē
		i1te
		u1še
		ī1tu
		u1ģo
		e1ši
		ū1ba
		e1ņa
		u1si
		ē1zo
		ū1kā
		i1gu
		ū1da
		i1sū
		o1bī
		a1mo
		ē1gā
		ā1ve
		u1bē
		e1ņo
		ē1vo
		ī1mī
		u1ļu
		ā1tu
		i1cī
		u1fa
		ā1tā
		ē1gu
		o1ga
		i1mi
		i1fē
		i1ļe
		ā1co
		u1žī
		i1zē
		i1vu
		a1ju
		i1ca
		ī1ču
		ū1re
		ē1bi
		e1ro
		i1fā
		a1he
		u1mo
		i1jo
		e1bu
		ī1ro
		a1te
		ī1ģi
		ā1di
		i1bū
		u1ļi
		u1le
		a1na
		e1tā
		e1bā
		o1tū
		ū1ze
		ā1fu
		ī1be
		a1pā
		u1de
		i1dū
		e1ve
		ī1di
		a1vo
		u1lā
		e1pi
		u1dē
		ē1dā
		o1jo
		i1žo
		ī1ķe
		o1nā
		e1mū
		ā1zā
		a1ro
		ī1rā
		a1že
		u1je
		a1ti
		ū1cī
		i1tī
		ī1vi
		ī1jo
		e1co
		i1tū
		i1bo
		ū1pe
		e1tū
		o1pā
		ē1se
		a1ļā
		ā1ji
		a1čo
		e1za
		ā1mē
		a1žū
		e1šo
		ī1ļu
		ū1jā
		o1su
		e1ja
		o1ta
		e1lī
		o1ze
		ī1vē
		o1vā
		a1vī
		i1kī
		ā1zī
		u1ha
		ī1pē
		i1de
		o1nē
		ū1bī
		ē1tu
		a1ži
		ā1žu
		o1ņā
		o1ļo
		i1ņē
		u1ci
		ī1ca
		ū1sa
		e1rī
		i1bē
		e1ne
		a1šī
		u1gi
		ī1mu
		a1zā
		i1lo
		ī1cē
		u1lī
		e1čo
		a1bu
		i1nī
		ā1dā
		ā1tē
		ā1ko
		ī1šu
		o1ģi
		a1ta
		i1la
		a1va
		a1še
		a1hi
		a1ca
		e1be
		e1žē
		a1su
		ī1dī
		o1da
		e1ģo
		e1ņu
		e1pa
		ī1jā
		e1sā
		a1ņi
		ū1so
		ī1nu
		i1vo
		ū1lo
		ī1nē
		ē1mī
		ū1cu
		o1žē
		ē1jā
		ī1cā
		a1ču
		o1zū
		a1lu
		ā1lu
		o1ņu
		a1vu
		i1tu
		i1ķu
		i1ķo
		i1ko
		a1fa
		ī1pi
		i1go
		i1me
		a1fi
		e1sū
		ī1ju
		o1pe
		a1sī
		a1nē
		ū1že
		ē1ve
		i1po
		o1zē
		a1ne
		e1sa
		a1lē
		ē1ša
		ū1gi
		ē1lā
		i1mū
		u1vā
		ū1mī
		ū1mē
		u1ro
		ā1po
		o1ju
		i1fu
		i1jē
		i1ga
		ū1tā
		ē1lu
		ū1sā
		a1gū
		ā1bā
		a1la
		o1ri
		ē1šo
		ū1ņa
		o1fē
		e1li
		ē1ko
		u1va
		ī1šo
		a1zi
		e1dī
		i1da
		i1šī
		i1hī
		i1ne
		i1šu
		ē1ku
		e1ņā
		o1na
		ī1ža
		o1ča
		ā1fa
		o1tē
		ī1dē
		o1tā
		i1hi
		ē1mu
		ī1so
		e1cā
		ā1zi
		ī1cī
		u1šē
		o1no
		ā1ņe
		u1bu
		ū1gē
		o1ve
		a1ģī
		i1lu
		i1pa
		e1ka
		ā1ci
		u1ķī
		o1sa
		o1go
		i1nu
		ī1žo
		i1sī
		o1fī
		a1pu
		a1du
		ī1ļi
		o1ba
		i1fa
		e1mi
		o1cu
		u1ža
		ā1mi
		a1ķā
		i1ču
		o1žū
		ī1kā
		ā1ķe
		u1ģē
		e1da
		ē1dī
		ī1čo
		ū1pa
		ā1de
		o1ma
		i1dā
		ē1ņo
		ū1žu
		o1ko
		a1vē
		ā1zē
		ā1sā
		ī1do
		u1cā
		ī1ļā
		u1du
		e1ju
		ā1si
		o1vē
		i1ša
		u1fe
		o1ji
		ē1re
		ū1ļī
		u1ņa
		ā1ca
		a1šu
		ū1nu
		ū1le
		e1ķi
		ā1tī
		o1ge
		i1vā
		ū1za
		ē1nā
		ū1ma
		ā1ķu
		e1lē
		ā1sē
		ā1li
		ī1ne
		i1mī
		ā1pi
		a1mā
		a1žu
		i1ju
		ē1vu
		u1nā
		ū1ru
		e1vi
		a1pa
		i1bā
		o1cē
		ā1lē
		e1ku
		u1lē
		i1se
		e1vā
		ē1jē
		e1pī
		ē1ci
		o1ši
		a1hā
		a1kā
		u1ji
		ū1rī
		ī1sā
		i1ro
		o1rā
		ū1ki
		o1ro
		e1ru
		o1kū
		ē1su
		a1ņā
		ū1tī
		ā1ba
		e1ņe
		e1nu
		ē1te
		ā1vo
		a1sa
		e1nū
		ū1žī
		o1že
		ū1do
		ē1jī
		ī1vu
		o1vi
		u1ba
		ā1na
		ī1mē
		a1ji
		u1ti
		e1mo
		a1ra
		e1hi
		o1te
		u1bo
		e1su
		i1fī
		ē1pi
		i1ģi
		ī1ņu
		ū1lī
		ā1ro
		o1zā
		a1vi
		o1ni
		ī1za
		o1do
		ī1zā
		o1gē
		u1zū
		u1li
		u1da
		a1či
		e1ta
		i1ra
		ā1ķa
		a1jū
		ī1ba
		a1cē
		u1ra
		i1kā
		i1zu
		ē1nu
		a1šā
		e1to
		u1gē
		ū1pī
		a1ho
		ā1je
		ī1ķa
		a1ve
		o1šu
		u1čo
		ī1mi
		u1sī
		a1dū
		e1cū
		ī1rī
		u1ko
		ā1ķī
		ā1zu
		ā1mu
		ī1sa
		ā1ņu
		u1ka
		i1ba
		ū1vi
		ē1ga
		ē1ģe
		a1rī
		u1ša
		u1cī
		a1co
		ī1cu
		o1vu
		i1je
		u1do
		o1cā
		ā1vi
		i1jā
		a1ze
		a1mu
		o1ņi
		e1ža
		o1čī
		i1ča
		i1mē
		ā1cī
		ē1la
		e1dū
		ū1nī
		ī1po
		ē1ļi
		ī1nā
		ū1be
		u1se
		ū1ci
		ī1ņā
		ī1ke
		ā1cē
		ē1sa
		ē1li
		a1ģā
		u1pe
		ā1ku
		a1bī
		u1pu
		o1ca
		u1ne
		ī1ļī
		u1mi
		e1du
		i1ļu
		u1pā
		ī1ņa
		ī1pu
		u1be
		o1ču
		o1šē
		ū1šo
		ē1me
		a1ķa
		u1zo
		ē1zā
		ū1ce
		e1tī
		o1ķu
		ē1jo
		u1tū
		ā1cu
		i1vi
		e1žā
		a1jo
		e1jo
		ū1bi
		u1nī
		ā1ļu
		e1zo
		i1ma
		u1vē
		o1jū
		o1ha
		ū1pu
		e1ša
		a1ru
		a1li
		u1mī
		ū1ve
		ā1pe
		i1cu
		ū1nā
		ī1sī
		e1pe
		ī1zī
		i1rī
		ī1pe
		o1po
		ā1rē
		a1ņe
		ī1gi
		e1žī
		ī1lu
		i1su
		ī1tā
		a1no
		ī1ži
		a1sū
		a1ko
		i1žē
		u1jo
		i1va
		ī1ji
		a1fe
		o1pa
		e1rē
		e1šī
		ē1cu
		i1šā
		ū1žā
		e1ģe
		ē1cā
		a1po
		i1tā
		ā1ne
		ī1va
		e1se
		ī1ra
		o1gu
		ū1de
		u1dā
		i1di
		u1rā
		ē1nē
		a1to
		e1fī
		a1so
		e1ze
		ē1le
		o1mu
		ī1ta
		e1ļu
		a1zē
		ē1ķē
		o1ģe
		e1na
		ū1vē
		ē1du
		u1žo
		i1nē
		ī1si
		i1ka
		ī1fe
		e1no
		i1le
		e1pē
		e1ģē
		ā1go
		i1ni
		e1ča
		a1čī
		ē1be
		a1ša
		e1gi
		i1mu
		ē1bē
		a1čū
		ī1šā
		a1bā
		ī1du
		o1ci
		ē1bo
		ā1ki
		o1mo
		ē1lo
		o1lā
		o1le
		a1gī
		u1kā
		ē1vi
		ī1lē
		u1čē
		ē1mo
		a1cī
		u1ča
		ī1to
		a1fē
		u1ķi
		e1fa
		ī1ša
		o1bā
		a1ļi
		ī1da
		a1mī
		i1gā
		a1ģē
		e1cī
		ā1ta
		i1re
		ā1me
		ū1dē
		a1re
		ī1li
		a1ga
		o1tu
		u1pī
		e1ha
		ā1ķē
		e1tu
		i1ģē
		e1kē
		ā1bē
		o1čū
		a1zu
		ū1sē
		ū1ne
		ā1ga
		ū1vo
		o1ho
		ē1ļā
		o1rī
		ū1ju
		o1fu
		ū1ji
		o1lū
		ā1do
		i1to
		u1bā
		u1ge
		u1cē
		a1le
		u1ķē
		ī1ce
		a1ķu
		ā1ze
		e1šu
		ē1ja
		a1vū
		i1ņā
		ē1na
		o1ne
		ā1dē
		ā1ģa
		u1su
		u1sa
		ē1di
		ū1su
		e1fo
		ē1ni
		ī1pī
		i1ku
		ē1pa
		ē1po
		ī1zi
		i1ļa
		i1ši
		ē1lī
		ā1no
		a1jī
		ā1gā
		o1zī
		ā1dī
		o1ļi
		ā1rā
		ē1zi
		ū1pi
		ē1ge
		o1mū
		i1kē
		e1gū
		u1gu
		i1zū
		a1gu
		a1lū
		i1cā
		ū1lā
		o1ķe
		o1se
		ē1vā
		ē1ru
		a1fo
		e1sē
		ā1re
		ā1lā
		e1ļi
		a1ņu
		e1jā
		ā1ža
		ē1zu
		e1ņi
		u1pi
		ē1mē
		o1ņē
		o1ti
		u1pē
		e1zī
		u1fi
		e1ķe
		ā1jā
		u1vī
		ī1ņi
		u1žā
		ū1li
		e1de
		o1be
		ē1zī
		e1hu
		e1he
		ī1lā
		u1tē
		e1nā
		a1sā
		ā1se
		ē1ļo
		a1ģi
		ī1ze
		o1je
		ū1te
		e1kū
		o1li
		ā1ce
		o1vī
		i1ci
		ā1so
		e1ge
		i1še
		a1ni
		i1do
		ā1lū
		o1žā
		o1še
		o1zu
		a1cu
		e1mē
		e1gu
		ē1ta
		a1do
		e1ba
		ē1ģi
		e1žo
		ā1gū
		a1za
		ū1la
		ū1ķī
		a1pi
		ī1nī
		ū1šā
		i1šē
		o1ļe
		ē1mi
		u1zā
		i1ķā
		ī1ko
		o1dū
		ī1ķi
		a1ķē
		ā1su
		ī1lī
		e1čā
		ē1ļe
		u1za
		o1ži
		o1fe
		ū1tē
		o1ki
		ā1za
		e1le
		ē1bī
		a1di
		o1sē
		ī1žu
		ī1bo
		u1me
		a1rē
		i1ļo
		ū1si
		ā1sī
		u1ni
		ī1ka
		ā1ļi
		o1tī
		ā1šo
		u1tu
		e1žu
		i1ža
		o1lu
		ē1rī
		ā1ju
		u1šī
		a1ķe
		ē1so
		ā1da
		ē1ba
		ē1ri
		o1ce
		ē1ki
		i1ļā
		a1pe
		o1šū
		u1ļo
		ī1zo
		ē1rū
		e1go
		e1te
		i1za
		e1vo
		u1vi
		i1fe
		i1ņu
		ā1zo
		ē1zē
		o1jē
		u1re
		ā1ņa
		ē1pā
		o1žo
		u1nē
		u1ņu
		ū1du
		a1ļu
		u1mē
		ē1pu
		u1lo
		i1ji
		ā1rī
		ī1rē
		e1rā
		u1ru
		a1cā
		o1rū
		ū1na
		u1ģe
		ū1dā
		u1tā
		i1sa
		at1tu
		eg1rū
		ak1so
		it1de
		eb1lā
		et1vī
		or1bi
		al1ša
		ap1dū
		ak1na
		um1ci
		aš1le
		ēr1ķe
		en1ku
		il1ki
		ēr1ku
		at1nā
		at1ģē
		us1pē
		os1vī
		os1ci
		an1ra
		en1pa
		ej1dē
		až1vī
		as1bu
		īs1ga
		iņ1di
		en1to
		uj1me
		or1ki
		el1zo
		ot1nē
		es1ko
		uz1gu
		ak1ti
		īr1ni
		iz1hi
		il1pu
		es1ma
		āt1vi
		ag1rē
		on1zē
		īb1tu
		ap1do
		īt1vī
		ul1sā
		īk1lī
		ur1so
		ok1tē
		ēb1tu
		īs1la
		et1ve
		al1mo
		op1ša
		en1ce
		im1nī
		uš1ķa
		ek1ti
		iz1cī
		er1di
		ur1fa
		an1tā
		er1ba
		as1pe
		al1su
		ip1so
		al1cī
		at1de
		aņ1ra
		ēk1šu
		īg1li
		om1ni
		oņ1ka
		as1le
		at1ņi
		id1rī
		un1ve
		al1kū
		in1da
		ār1ba
		īs1žu
		al1ka
		up1jī
		ur1gu
		at1sī
		īg1mā
		āl1ti
		al1va
		uļ1ku
		ok1rē
		er1gi
		uz1ļo
		ak1šē
		īm1re
		iz1te
		āt1vē
		ēg1ni
		īg1ru
		il1cē
		ir1mu
		ar1ku
		ot1zi
		ub1na
		an1če
		om1bī
		ēg1si
		el1le
		av1ru
		il1nu
		ēs1te
		ur1kā
		ik1ro
		ep1nu
		ur1vē
		oņ1lu
		it1ma
		il1ja
		ēj1tē
		an1ga
		eš1pa
		āl1ce
		ob1rī
		ur1vi
		up1ri
		ēz1tā
		iz1čo
		ap1ša
		uz1ru
		ut1rē
		ar1to
		ež1nī
		aš1ļu
		aļ1ce
		al1ne
		is1sī
		ib1šo
		uz1nu
		ut1ņu
		ul1de
		ār1ho
		am1pū
		ēl1gu
		um1vi
		ik1to
		ēr1ze
		ož1va
		ez1nī
		am1lī
		ak1se
		el1ko
		ep1si
		āj1tu
		um1zā
		at1ja
		al1ķī
		az1dā
		or1to
		ec1he
		at1cī
		en1ko
		ūs1ki
		īg1sa
		ef1ri
		ār1sa
		im1po
		īt1rī
		ed1vi
		id1sē
		ā1džā
		up1la
		ēc1te
		es1pu
		uk1šo
		āp1ni
		ā1dži
		ak1la
		en1na
		as1ka
		ām1di
		ag1li
		og1rā
		ag1dā
		oz1vi
		an1ku
		īk1nē
		us1mū
		er1ma
		āb1ša
		in1tu
		ob1ti
		ap1cu
		es1vā
		ac1ti
		ur1pu
		ar1kī
		el1la
		it1ta
		am1le
		ik1se
